Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-213
School lands; eminent domain proceedings.

Educational lands belonging to the state may be acquired through the exercise of eminent domain proceedings for the special purposes mentioned in sections 72-214 to 72-226.

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 1, p. 573;

R.S.1943, § 72-213.

Taking of educational land by eminent domain for county fair purposes is authorized. State v. Cheyenne County, 157 Neb. 533, 60 N.W.2d 593 (1953).

School lands cannot be taken from state by judicial process unless full value is paid to the state. State v. Platte Valley P. P. & I. Dist., 147 Neb. 289, 23 N.W.2d 300 (1946).